Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2711.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.084, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Prohibition. (a) A sitting member of the legislature is prohibited from accepting employment with or otherwise receiving compensation for services performed from: (1) a business whose primary source of revenue is derived from lobbying, government relations or government affairs services; (2) a business whose primary source of revenue is derived from facilitating government relations or government affairs services between two third parties; or (3) deleted text begin any other business that employs or contracts with lobbyists, government relations or government affairs professionals, if the member's job duties include acting in that capacity or providing direct or indirect consulting, advice, or administrative support for that workdeleted text end new text begin a business whose primary source of revenue is derived from facilitating government relations or government affairs services if the member's job duties include offering direct or indirect consulting or advice that helps the business provide government relations or government affairs services to clientsnew text end . (b) This prohibition applies regardless of the location where the work of the business is substantially conducted or its clients are located. (c) The house of representatives and the senate must adopt rules to enforce this section.